Hawaii, session 2026, GM1146.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that early intervention
is vital to ensure the efficient and effective rehabilitation of
employees who suffer a work-related injury. This often begins
with the referral of an injured employee for vocational
rehabilitation services. Vocational rehabilitation services are
intended to help the employee return to work as quickly as
possible with pay as close as possible to pre-injury wages.
Urgency is needed when initiating the vocational rehabilitation
process to avoid prolonged adverse effects on injured employees
and minimize costs for employers and insurers.
The legislature further finds that it is crucial for
injured employees to have access to appropriate vocational
rehabilitation services in the State. Many vocational
rehabilitation providers have expressed concern regarding the
future availability of services as providers retire or leave the
practice. It is important for current and future providers to
be properly trained on the vocational rehabilitation process.
2026-3316 HB1514 GDI HMSO
IIIMIIIillMIIIHimiM

Page 2
H.B. NO. S
C.D. 1
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to:
(1) Clarify the process for selecting a certified provider
of vocational rehabilitation services;
(2) Require a provider to automatically approve an injured
employee for vocational rehabilitation services if the
provider determines that the injured employee will
likely require vocational rehabilitation services to
return to suitable gainful employment; and
(3) Clarify the process for an employer to object to a
vocational rehabilitation plan.
SECTION 2. Section 386-25, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§386-25 Vocational rehabilitation. (a) The purposes of
vocational rehabilitation are to restore an injured worker's
earnings capacity as nearly as possible to that level that the
worker was earning at the time of injury and to return the
injured worker to suitable gainful employment in the active
labor force as quickly as possible in a cost-effective manner.
Vocational rehabilitation shall not be available for public
employees who have retired from a public employer, as defined in
section 76-11, with whom they sustained their work injury.
2026-3316 HB1514 CDl HMSO

iiiniiMniiiniiiini

Page 3
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
Employees of public employers, as defined in section 76-11,
who are eligible for their respective public employer's return
to work program, shall participate in and complete the return to
work program, including temporary light duty placement efforts,
as a prerequisite to vocational rehabilitation benefits under
this section.
(b) The director may refer employees who may have or have
suffered permanent disability as a result of work injuries and
who, in the director's opinion, can be vocationally
rehabilitated to the department of human services or to private
providers of rehabilitation services for vocational
rehabilitation services that are feasible. A referral shall be
made upon recommendation of the rehabilitation unit established
under section 386-71.5 and after the employee has been deemed
physically able to participate in rehabilitation by the
employee's attending physician. The unit shall include
appropriate professional staff and shall have the following
duties and responsibilities:
(1) To review and approve vocational rehabilitation plans
developed by certified providers of vocational
2026-3316 HB1514 CDl HMSO 3
wiiiiiiiBiiiiiinniiiiii

Page 4
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
rehabilitation services, whether they be private or
public;
(2) To adopt rules consistent with this section that shall
expedite and facilitate the identification,
notification, and referral of industrially injured
employees to vocational rehabilitation services, and
establish minimum standards for providers providing
vocational rehabilitation services under this section;
(3) To certify private and public providers of vocational
rehabilitation services meeting the minimum standards
established under paragraph (2); and
(4) To enforce the implementation of vocational
rehabilitation plans.
(c) Enrollment in a vocational rehabilitation plan or
program shall not be mandatory and the approval of a proposed
vocational rehabilitation plan or program by the injured
employee shall be required. [¥he] If the injured employee
elects to enroll in a vocational rehabilitation plan or program,
the injured employee [fftay] shall select a certified provider of
vocational rehabilitation services -- Betfe] no later than thirty
days after the referral is made. Once the injured employee
2026-3316 HB1514 GDI HMSO
lilHiMlllllllinMIilll

Page 5
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
selects a certified provider, both the certified provider and
the injured employee [—within -a roaseftab-lc timo after initiating
rehabilitation scrvicoo,] shall give proper notice of selection
to the employer[—] within seven days. If the injured employee
fails to select a certified provider within thirty days, the
employer shall select a certified provider of vocational
rehabilitation services and give proper notice of selection to
the injured employee.
(d) A provider shall submit an initial evaluation report
of the employee to the employer and the director within
forty-five days of the date of referral or selection. The
evaluation shall determine whether the employee requires
vocational rehabilitation services to return to suitable gainful
employment, identify the necessary services, and state whether
the provider can provide these services. The initial evaluation
report shall contain:
(1) An assessment of the employee's:
(A) Current medical status;
(B) Primary disability;
(C) Secondary disability;
2026-3316 HB1514 CDl HMSO

■RllllllliillllllililO

Page 6 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(D) Disabilities that are not related to the work
injury; and
(E) Physical or psychological limitations,^ or both.
If this information is not provided by the treating
physician within a reasonable amount of time,
information from another physician shall be accepted;
(2) A job analysis addressing the demands of the
employee's employment;
(3) A statement from the provider identifying the
employee's vocational handicaps in relation to the
employee's ability to;
(A) Return to usual and customary employment; and
(B) Participate in and benefit from a vocational
rehabilitation plan or program;
(4) A statement from the provider determining the
feasibility of vocational rehabilitation services,
including:
(A) The provider's ability to assist the employee in
the employee's efforts to return to suitable
gainful employment;
2026-3316 HB1514 GDI HMSO 6
IIIIIIIIIIIMIIIIHffiilM

Page 7
H.B. NO.
C.D, 1
(B) An outline of specific vocational rehabilitation
services to be provided, justification for the
necessity of services, and how the effectiveness
of these services is measured; and
(C) How the vocational rehabilitation services
directly relate to the employee obtaining
suitable gainful employment; and
(5) The enrollment form and the statement of worker's
rights and responsibilities form obtained from the
department.
(e) A provider shall automatically approve vocational
rehabilitation services for an injured employee; provided that
the provider determines that the injured employee will likely
require vocational rehabilitation services to return to suitable
gainful employment, and the initial evaluation report finds the
injured employee feasible to participate.
[-teM (f) A provider shall file the employee's vocational
rehabilitation plan with the approval of the employee[—]
later than one hundred twenty days after the provider submits an
initial evaluation report; provided that the director may grant
an extension in the director's discretion. Upon receipt of the
2026-3316 HB1514 GDI HMSO
liiiMiHiniiiiiiiiin

Page 8
H.B. NO.
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
vocational rehabilitation plan from the provider, an employee
shall have ten days to review and sign the vocational
rehabilitation plan. The vocational rehabilitation plan shall
be submitted to the employer and the employee and be filed with
the director within two days from the date of the employee's
signature. A vocational rehabilitation plan shall include a
statement of the feasibility of the vocational goal, using the
process of:
(1) First determining if the employee's usual and
customary employment represents suitable gainful
employment, and, should it not;
(2) Next determining if modified work or other work with
the same employer represents suitable gainful
employment, and, should it not;
(3) Next determining if modified or other employment with
a different employer represents suitable gainful
employment, and [finally], should it not;
(4) Then providing training to obtain employment in
another occupational field. When training to obtain
employment in another occupational field is required,
2026-3316 HB1514 GDI HMSO
■lillliiHlllilllHI

Page 9 1514
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
the first appropriate option among the following
options shall be selected for the employee:
(A) On-the-job training;
(B) Short-term retraining program (less than
fifty-two weeks); or
(C) Long-term retraining program (more than fifty-two
weeks); and
(5) [LastiyT—i-f] If training under paragraph (4) is not
feasible, then self-employment may be considered.
[-HR-] (g) A vocational rehabilitation plan may be approved
by the director; provided that the vocational rehabilitation
plan includes:
(1) A physician's assessment of the employee's physical
limitations, psychological limitations, and ability to
return to work. If this information is not provided
by the treating physician within a reasonable amount
of time, information from another physician shall be
accepted;
(2) A labor market survey indicating there are reasonable
assurances that the proposed occupation for which the
employee is to be placed or trained is readily
2026-3316 HB1514 CDl HMSO
IMNHIIIimillllilill

Page 10 H.B. NO. 1514
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
available in the community when placement begins, or
there are assurances of reemployment by the employer;
(3) A job analysis of the proposed occupation, setting
forth its duties, responsibilities, physical demands,
environmental working conditions, specific
qualifications needed for entry-level employment,
reasonable accommodations, expected estimated
earnings, and other relevant information;
(4) The nature and extent of the vocational rehabilitation
services to be provided, including:
(A) Specific services to be provided;
(B) Justification for the necessity of the services;
(C) Estimated time frames for delivery of services;
(D) The manner in which the effectiveness of these
services is to be measured;
(E) Criteria for determining successful completion of
the vocational rehabilitation plan; and
(F) The employee's responsibilities;
(5) A report of tests and copies thereof that have been
administered to the employee, including a statement
2026-3316 HB1514 CDl HMSO 10
IIIIIMRIlilliHUIIIiHHII

Page 11 H.B. NO. 1514
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
regarding the need for and use of the tests to
identify a vocational goal;
(6) If retraining, including on-the-job training, is found
to be necessary, the estimated cost of retraining, a
description of specific skills to be learned or
knowledge acquired with specific time periods and
clearly defined measurements of success, and the
nature, amount, and duration of living expenses;
(7) The total cost of the vocational rehabilitation plan;
and
(8) The employee's approval of the vocational
rehabilitation plan.
[-€^] (h) The employer shall have ten calendar days from
[thc^xsotmark date on which tho plan was mailed] the receipt of
the vocational rehabilitation plan to submit in writing to the
director any objections to the vocational rehabilitation plan.
A vocational rehabilitation plan shall be deemed received by an
employer when it is transmitted with reasonable evidence of
receipt.
[ (h) ] (i) The director may approve a vocational
rehabilitation plan that does not include all of the
2026-3316 HB1514 CDl HMSO

llllimillllHIlUIIIIIIH

Page 12
H.B. NO. S?
S.D, 1
C.D. 1
requirements outlined in subsection 1212. provided that
the director finds the vocational rehabilitation plan:
(1) Is in the best interest of the employee;
(2) Contains reasonable assurances that the employee will
be placed in suitable gainful employment; and
(3) Has been approved by the employee.
[-H4-] m If the vocational rehabilitation plan requires
the purchase of any tools, supplies, or equipment, the purchase
deadline shall be included in the vocational rehabilitation
plan. Tools, supplies, and equipment shall be considered to be
the property of the employer until the vocational rehabilitation
plan is determined by the director to be successfully completed,
after which it shall become the property of the employee. If
the vocational rehabilitation plan requires the purchase,
[etc.■, ] the employer shall purchase the items [p^2rer^-te] before
the purchase deadline in the vocational rehabilitation plan.
[4^] (k) An employee with an approved vocational
rehabilitation plan who is determined as able to return to usual
and customary employment may choose to complete the vocational
rehabilitation plan or request a new vocational rehabilitation
2026-3316 HB1514 GDI HMSO 12

Page 13
H.B. NO.
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
plan of which the goal may be the employee's usual and customary
employment.
[-0^] (1) An injured employee's enrollment in a vocational
rehabilitation plan or program shall not affect the employee's
entitlement to temporary total disability compensation if the
employee earns no wages during the period of enrollment. If the
employee receives wages for work performed under the vocational
rehabilitation plan or program, the employee shall be entitled
to temporary total disability compensation in an amount equal to
the difference between the employee's average weekly wages at
the time of injury and the wages received under the vocational
rehabilitation plan or program, subject to the limitations on
weekly benefit rates prescribed in section 386-31 (a) . The
employee shall not be entitled to temporary total disability
compensation for any week during this period where the wages
equal or exceed the average weekly wages at the time of injury.
[4-14-] (m) The director shall adopt rules for additional
living expenses necessitated by the vocational rehabilitation
plan or program, together with all reasonable and necessary
vocational training.
2026-3316 HB1514 GDI HMSO

IIMillliHBIIMffiiniNIi

Page 14
H.B. NO.
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
(n) If the rehabilitation unit determines that
vocational rehabilitation is not possible or feasible, it shall
certify the determination to the director.
[(n)] (o) Except as otherwise provided, determinations of
the rehabilitation unit shall be final unless a written request
for reconsideration is filed with the rehabilitation unit within
ten calendar days of the date of the determination.
The rehabilitation unit shall issue a reconsideration
determination to affirm, reverse, or modify the determination or
refer the request for reconsideration for hearing.
[(o)] (p) A reconsideration determination shall be final
unless a written request for hearing is filed within ten
calendar days from the date of the reconsideration
determination. All hearings shall be held before a hearings
officer designated by the director. A written decision shall be
issued in the name of the director.
[(p)] (q) The eligibility of any injured employee to
receive other benefits under this chapter shall in no way be
affected by the employee’s [entrance upon a course of]
enrollment in a vocational rehabilitation plan or program as
[be^^eift] provided[—] in this section.
2026-3316 HB1514 CDl HMSO 1
■IMinillllilllMIIH

Page 15
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
[-(-g^] (r) Vocational rehabilitation services for the
purpose of developing a vocational rehabilitation plan may be
approved by the director and the director may periodically
review progress in each case."
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-3316 HB1514 CDl HMSO 15
linniiiiniHiiiiiiiiii

H.B. NO. 1514
±
W
d
Q
Q
Q
APPROVED this 27th day of May , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1514, HD 2, SD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1514, H.D. 2, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: April 30, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
President of the Senate
Clerk of the Senate
4-26